Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB658.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 21 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FTEMPORARY POLICE ASSISTANCEIN CERTAIN CITIES AND TOWNSHIPSSec.2191. Definitions.2192. Retired police officer program.§ 2191. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Municipality." A city of the first class or a township of 123456789101112131415161718 the first class."Police department." A public agency of a municipality having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of the criminal or traffic laws."Police officer." A full-time or part-time employee assigned to criminal or traffic law enforcement duties of a police department."Program." A program for retired police officers established under section 2192(a) (relating to retired police officer program).§ 2192. Retired police officer program.(a) Establishment.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, a police department may establish a program for retired police officers to return to work for the police department for a period of not more than five years.(b) Standards.--For a retired police officer to return to work for a police department under a program, the retired police officer:(1) May not have any record of unacceptable behavior or disciplinary action as an active police officer.(2) Shall complete the training established under subsection (c).(c) Training.--The Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission shall establish an eight-week training program for retired police officers returning to work for a police department under a program.(d) Retirement benefit implications.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), a retired police officer's participation in a program shall not affect any benefits received from a municipal retirement 20250HB0658PN0667 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system.(2) Prior to a retired police officer's participation in a program, the police officer must irrevocably elect, in a writing filed with the municipality that established the program or a designee of the municipality, to:(i) continue receipt of the police officer's early or superannuation retirement pension benefits; or(ii) discontinue the police officer's early or superannuation retirement pension benefits while the police officer participates in the program.(3) A retired police officer who participates in a program shall receive credited service for the work based on the duration of time and compensation received while participating in the program, and the credited service shall be applied to the retirement benefits due the police officer in accordance with the retirement plan of the municipality.(e) Expiration.--Each program shall expire six years after the effective date of subsection (a).(f) Applicability.--This section shall only apply to police officers who retire prior to the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0658PN0667 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122